North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-02.1 North Dakota Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act
19-02.1-17.
Cosmetics — Adulteration defined.

A cosmetic must be deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to users under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof, or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual; provided, that this provision does not apply to coal-tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed thereon: “Caution — This product contains ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness”, and the labeling of which bears adequate directions for such preliminary testing. For the purpose of this subsection and subsection 5, the term “hair dye” does not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow dyes.

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health.

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If it is not a hair dye and it is, or it bears or contains, a color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 18.

Collateral References.

Failure to warn as basis of liability under doctrine of strict liability in tort, 53 A.L.R.3d 239.

19-02.1-18.
Cosmetics — Misbranding defined.

A cosmetic must be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under this subdivision reasonable variations must be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages must be established by regulations prescribed by the department.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

If it is a color additive, unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive prescribed under the provisions of the federal act. This subsection does not apply to packages of color additives which, with respect to their use for cosmetics, are marketed and intended for use only in or on hair dyes, as defined in the last sentence of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-17.

If its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued pursuant to section 3 or 4 of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 19; 1989, ch. 264, § 7.

Note.

Sections 3 and 4 of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970, referred to in subsection 6 of this section, are compiled at 15 USCS, §§ 1472 and 1473, respectively.

19-02.1-19.
False advertising.

An advertisement of a food, drug, device, or cosmetic is false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

For the purpose of this chapter, the advertisement of a drug or device representing it to have any effect in albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poison, bone disease, Bright’s disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholecystitis, diabetes, diphtheria, dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis (infantile paralysis), prostate gland disorders, pyelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sexually transmitted disease, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, or uremia is also false, except that no advertisement not in violation of subsection 1 is false under this subsection if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, dental, pharmaceutical, or veterinary professions, or appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public health education by persons not commercially interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of such drugs or devices; provided, that whenever the department determines that an advance in medical science has made any type of self-medication safe as to any of the diseases named above, the department by rule shall authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for such disease, subject to such conditions and restrictions as the department may deem necessary in the interests of public health; and provided, further, that this subsection may not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those named herein is safe or efficacious.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 20; 1989, ch. 181, § 2.

19-02.1-20.
Rules.

The authority to adopt rules for the efficient enforcement of this chapter is hereby vested in the department. The department is hereby authorized to make the rules adopted under this chapter conform, insofar as practicable, with those adopted under the federal act. Rules must conform and be consistent with the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act. When adopting any rules under this chapter, the department shall follow the procedures under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 21; 1971, ch. 235, § 48; 1987, ch. 263, § 8.

Note.

The Uniform Controlled Substances Act, referred to in this section, is codified at N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.1.

19-02.1-21.
Inspections — Examinations.

The department has free access at all reasonable hours to any factory, warehouse, or establishment in which foods, drugs, devices, or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold such foods, drugs, devices, or cosmetics in commerce, for the purpose of inspecting such factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle to determine if this chapter is being violated and to secure samples or specimens of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic after paying or offering to pay for such sample.

The department shall make or cause to be made examinations of samples secured under this section to determine whether or not this chapter is being violated.

Inspections of slaughterhouses, meatpacking, and meat processing plants where cattle, swine, sheep, goats, farmed elk, horses, or other equines are slaughtered for human food or where the carcass or the parts thereof, meat, or meat food products are salted, canned, packed, smoked, cured, rendered, or otherwise processed or prepared for human food may not be performed under this chapter if the slaughterhouses, meatpacking, or meat processing plants are inspected under the North Dakota Meat Inspection Act, or the Federal Meat Inspection Act, as amended [34 Stat. 1260-65; 21 U.S.C. 71-91].

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 22; 1969, ch. 322, § 9; 1983, ch. 253, § 2; 1985, ch. 258, § 16; 1987, ch. 263, § 9; 1999, ch. 321, § 1.

19-02.1-22.
Publicity.

The department may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this chapter, including the nature of the charge and the disposition thereof.

The department may also cause to be disseminated such information regarding food, drugs, devices, and cosmetics as the department deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the department from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the investigations of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 23.

19-02.1-23.
Prohibition against manufacture of drugs — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 49.

19-02.1-24.
Sale of prepackaged food from vending machines — License — Rules — Inspections.

An establishment may not sell any type of prepackaged food from a food vending machine without first obtaining a license from the department. The license expires on June thirtieth of each year. The department may adopt rules establishing the amount and the procedures for the collection of license fees. License fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly.

The department may, in accordance with chapter 28-32, revoke an establishment’s license if the establishment fails to comply with the rules adopted pursuant to subsection 3.

The department may adopt, in accordance with chapter 28-32, rules which define “food vending machine” for the purposes of this section and rules governing the sanitation, maintenance, and construction of such vending machines and exempting certain types of machines from this section, if it is deemed appropriate and not materially detrimental to public health.

The department may inspect any food vending machine for compliance with the rules and for the presence of a license required by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 194, § 1; 1983, ch. 254, § 1; 1993, ch. 27, § 7; 2005, ch. 32, § 11.

19-02.1-25.
Country of origin labels.

Each retailer shall indicate, by label, to customers the country of origin of fresh beef, lamb, and pork available for sale to customers. For purposes of this section, a label means a clearly visible printed or written indication that is placed in the immediate vicinity of the food product. This section does not apply to a restaurant, cafeteria, prepared food service establishment, or mobile food unit.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 213, § 1.

19-02.1-26.
Limitation on exemplary damages.

Exemplary damages may not be awarded against the manufacturer or seller of a product or device that caused the harm claimed by the plaintiff if:

The product or device was subject to approval under 21 U.S.C. 355 or premarket approval under 21 U.S.C. 360e by the food and drug administration with respect to the safety of formulation or performance of the aspect of the product or device that caused the harm, or by the adequacy of the packaging or labeling of the product or device; or

The product or device was approved by the food and drug administration.

Subsection 1 does not apply in a case in which it is determined on the basis of clear and convincing evidence that the defendant:

Withheld from or misrepresented to the food and drug administration information concerning the product or device which is required to be submitted under the federal act which is material and relevant to the harm suffered by the claimant;

Made an illegal payment to an official of the food and drug administration for the purpose of securing approval of the product or device;

Failed to use reasonable care to comply with the food and drug administration regulations concerning the manufacture of, or the investigation and correction of defects in design or manufacture of, a medical device, and the failure to comply has caused the harm suffered by the plaintiff;

Made a significant or knowing departure from official food and drug administration requirements; or

Acted with conscious disregard for human safety.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 214, § 1.